Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 1 General Provisions
37-1-173. Individualized case plans and behavior responses.

An individualized case plan shall be developed by the department or supervising authority for every child adjudicated for a delinquent or unruly offense. The case plan shall be updated as appropriate and, in the case of a delinquent offense, shall be informed by the results of a validated risk and needs assessment.

For any child ordered to probation supervision pursuant to § 37-1-131 or § 37-1-132, the supervising authority shall develop and implement an individualized case plan in consultation with the child's parents, guardian, or legal custodian, the child's school, and other appropriate parties, and, for delinquent offenses, such plan shall be based upon the results of a validated risk and needs assessment conducted within seven (7) days of the court's disposition, excluding nonjudicial days.

The person or persons supervising probation shall work with the child and the child's parents, guardian, or legal custodian, and other appropriate parties to implement the case plan following disposition.

At a minimum, the case plan shall:

Identify the actions to be taken by the child and, if appropriate, the child's parents, guardian, or legal custodian, and other appropriate parties to ensure future lawful conduct and compliance with the court's order of disposition; and

Identify the services to be offered and provided to the child and, if appropriate, the child's parents, guardian, or legal custodian, and other appropriate parties, including, where appropriate:

Mental health and substance abuse services;

Education services;

Individual, group, and family counseling services;

Victim or community restitution; and

Services to address other relevant concerns identified by the supervising authority.

For any child committed to the department for a delinquent offense, the department shall ensure, in conjunction with any service provider, that it develops and implements an individualized case plan based upon the recommendations of the child, the child's parents, guardian, or custodian, and other appropriate parties and the results of the validated risk and needs assessment. The case plan shall cover the child's period of commitment to the department as well as home placement supervision.

The department shall work with the child, the child's parents, guardian, or legal custodian, other appropriate parties, and the child's service provider to implement the case plan.

At a minimum, the case plan shall:

Specify treatment goals and the actions to be taken by the child in order to demonstrate satisfactory attainment of each goal;

Specify the services to be offered and provided by the department and any service provider; and

Ensure appropriate reintegration of the child to the child's parents, guardian, or legal custodian, other appropriate parties, the child's school, and the community following the satisfactory completion of the case plan treatment goals, with a protocol and timeline for engaging the child's parents, guardian, or legal custodian prior to the release of the child.

The department and each juvenile court providing supervision services shall adopt a behavior response system that incorporates the following principles:

Behavior responses to children on all types of supervision should be swift, certain, and proportionate and provide for a continuum of options to address violations of the terms and conditions of supervision as well as incentivize positive behaviors on supervision; and

Behavior responses should be targeted to the child's risk and needs and to the severity of the violation of the terms and conditions of supervision.

The behavior response system shall be utilized by all supervising authorities involved in the juvenile justice system and in administering behavior responses on probation, home placement supervision, diversion, or any other type of supervision. The supervising authorities shall use the least restrictive behavior responses, and all violations and positive behaviors shall be documented in the child's individual case plan within three (3) days of occurrence, excluding nonjudicial days, including the type of violation or positive behavior, the response, and the results of the response.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 49.

Compiler's Notes. Former §37-1-173 (Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 76; 2000, ch. 947, § 8G), concerning status review for persons eighteen years of age or older, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 906, § 2, effective July 1, 2008.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. July 1, 2019; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

37-1-174. Order affecting delinquent juvenile's parent or guardian.

If an unemancipated child commits a delinquent or unruly act that brings the child within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court and if the child's parent or legal guardian, who is not the victim of the act that brings the child within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, did not take reasonable steps to control such delinquent or unruly conduct, then the court may order the parent or legal guardian to do one (1) or more of the following:

Participate in the child's program of treatment and rehabilitation;

Seek assistance from school officials, social service officials or other appropriate public or private resources and authorities to provide treatment and rehabilitation for the child;

Complete community service work individually or jointly with the child; or

Provide supervision to ensure that the child complies with any and all conditions and requirements that the court has ordered the child to follow.

If the parent or legal guardian violates or refuses to comply with the order of the juvenile court, then the parent or legal guardian may be held in contempt pursuant to § 37-1-158; and the juvenile court may fine the parent or legal guardian up to fifty dollars ($50.00), may incarcerate the parent or legal guardian in the county jail for up to ten (10) days or may impose both fine and incarceration. However, prior to holding any such parent or guardian in contempt, the parent or legal guardian shall be served with notice and shall be given a reasonable opportunity to be heard by the court.

This section shall not apply to the department of children's services acting in its capacity as custodian or guardian of any child.

Acts 1997, ch. 465, § 2; 2000, ch. 834, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Punishment for contempt, title 29, ch. 9.

37-1-175. Temporary legal custody for children with mental illnesses.

IF AND ONLY IF

a child is the subject of a proceeding under this chapter, AND

the child is mentally ill, AND

the child needs care, training, or treatment because of the mental illness, AND

all available less drastic alternatives to committing the child to the temporary legal custody of the department are unsuitable to meet the child's needs for care, training, or treatment for the mental illness,

THEN

a juvenile court may commit the child to the temporary legal custody of the department in proceedings conducted in conformity with §§ 33-3-602 — 33-3-608, 33-3-610 — 33-3-620, and 33-6-505 — 33-6-508, to meet the child's needs for care, training, or treatment for the mental illness.

Acts 1986, ch. 836, § 3; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 37-39; T.C.A., §33-3-203; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1986, ch. 836, § 8, provided that the implementation of the provisions of this section as enacted by that act and the expenditure of any funds to implement such provisions shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner of finance and administration.

For the establishment of the Tennessee Children's Plan, see Executive Order No. 58 (June 29, 1994).

For transfer of certain case management functions from the department of mental health and mental retardation [department of mental health and developmental disabilities] to the department of health, see Executive Order No. 5 (November 9, 1995).

Law Reviews.

Reducing Unintended Ambiguity in Statutes: An Introduction to Normalization of Statutory Drafting (Grayfred B. Gray), 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 433 (1987).

Attorney General Opinions. Commitment of juveniles, OAG 87-188 (12/14/87).

37-1-176. Providing care, training or treatment in least drastic alternative way.

IF

a juvenile court commits a child to the temporary legal custody of the department under § 37-1-175,

THEN

the department shall provide the necessary care, training, or treatment for the child in the least drastic alternative way that is available and suitable to meet the child's needs, AND

community mental health centers and community programs that receive grants or contracts from the department to provide such services to children shall, at the direction of the department, provide the community-based services necessary to meet the child's needs for treatment in the least drastic alternative to hospitalization, AND

IF AND ONLY IF

placing the child in inpatient care in a hospital or treatment resource is the least drastic alternative way that is available to the department and is suitable to meet the child's needs,

THEN

the department shall apply for the child's admission to a hospital or treatment resource under title 33, chapter 6, part 2 or 4 or shall initiate proceedings under title 33, chapter 6, part 5.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 7.

37-1-177. Person filing for commitment.

If an evaluation under §37-1-128(d) shows that a child may be subject to commitment to the temporary legal custody of the department, the juvenile court may direct any person it determines to be suitable for the purpose to file a complaint under §37-1-175.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 7.

37-1-178. Discharge.

If a child no longer meets the standards under which the child was hospitalized or admitted to a treatment resource under §37-1-176(4), the child shall be discharged under title 33, chapter 6, part 7, and the child shall remain in the custody of the department until the department's custody is terminated under §§37-1-179 and37-1-180.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 7.

37-1-179. Reporting status of child who no longer meets commitment standards — Retention of custody.

If a child no longer meets the standards under which the child was committed to the custody of the department under §37-1-175, the department shall make a full report of the status of the child to the committing court. If the committing court objects to the termination of the department's custody, the court shall set a hearing on the matter within fifteen (15) days of the date of the report, with such hearing to be held at the earliest possible date. The department shall retain custody pending the outcome of the hearing. If the court does not set a hearing, the department's custody terminates at the end of the fifteenth day after the date of the report unless the court has approved an earlier termination.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 7.

37-1-180. Rights of child in hearing to review custody.

If the court sets a hearing to review the status of the child under §37-1-179, the child shall have the same rights as in the original commitment proceeding under §§33-3-605,33-3-608,33-3-610 —33-3-616, and33-3-620. If and only if the court finds on the basis of clear, unequivocal, and convincing evidence that the child is subject to commitment to the custody of the department under §37-1-175, the court may order that the child remain in the temporary legal custody of the department. If the court does not so find, the department's custody terminates at the end of the hearing.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 7.

37-1-181. Judges to conduct proceedings.

Proceedings under §§37-1-175 —37-1-181 may be held only by judges who are lawyers or by magistrates.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 7; 2009, ch. 235, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 235, § 1 directed the code commission to revise appropriate references from “child support referees” and “juvenile referees” to “child support magistrates” and “juvenile magistrates” in the code as supplements are published and volumes are replaced.

37-1-182. Juvenile records task force.

There is established a task force on the submission of juvenile fingerprints and reporting of juvenile court dispositions, which shall be named the juvenile records task force.

The task force shall have the following members:

The director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation (TBI) or the director's designee, who shall be a member of the director's staff;

A juvenile court judge or magistrate from each grand division of the state, who shall be appointed by the director of the administrative office of the courts;

A clerk or deputy clerk whose primary duties include the maintenance of juvenile court records, to be appointed by the president of the state court clerks' conference;

The commissioner of children's services or the commissioner's designee;

The attorney general and reporter or attorney general and reporter's designee, who shall be an ex officio member of the task force;

The chair of the judiciary committee of the senate and the chair of the committee of the house of representatives having jurisdiction over children and families or their designees, who shall be members of the task force;

The executive director of the Tennessee commission on children and youth or the executive director's designee.

Appointments shall be made within sixty (60) days after July 1, 2007. The governor shall designate the chair of the task force, who shall set the date of the first meeting. At the organizational meeting, a secretary shall be elected from the task force's membership.

The task force is authorized to request and receive assistance from any department, agency or entity of state government, upon request from the chair.

Members of the task force are volunteers and shall serve without pay, except that nonlegislative members may be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with travel regulations promulgated by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter. Members of the general assembly shall be compensated in accordance with the provisions of § 3-1-106.

The task force is directed to assess and examine:

The process of the submission of juvenile fingerprints to the TBI and to the federal bureau of investigation;

The maintenance of juvenile fingerprint cards;

The reporting of dispositions of juvenile offenses;

The disclosure or nondisclosure of juvenile offenses for employment or volunteer purposes;

Whether a juvenile offender repository is needed;

Whether any of the statutes referring to juvenile records and/or juvenile fingerprints are in direct conflict with other statutes and, if so, to determine how to correct any ambiguities; and

Any other relevant issues that concern juvenile fingerprint submissions, dispositions, and disclosures of juvenile records.

The task force is directed to submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any suggested legislation, to the general assembly and the governor no later than February 15, 2008.

Acts 2007, ch. 552, §§ 2-5; 2009, ch. 235, § 1; 2011, ch. 410, § 3(d); 2013, ch. 236, § 21; 2019, ch. 345, § 34.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 235, § 1 directed the code commission to revise appropriate references from “child support referees” and “juvenile referees” to “child support magistrates” and “juvenile magistrates” in the code as supplements are published and volumes are replaced.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “the chair of the committee of the house of representatives having jurisdiction over children and families” for “the chair of the civil justice committee of the house of representatives” in (a)(2)(F).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

37-1-183. Dependent and neglected child to remain in related caregiver’s custody if in best interest of child.

If the court finds that a child is dependent and neglected as defined in §37-1-102(b)(13)(J), the court shall order the child to remain in the related caregiver's custody if such an arrangement is in the best interest of the child. Any future order for modification or termination of the related caregiver's custody brought by the child's parent shall be based on a finding, by a preponderance of the evidence, that there has been a material change in circumstances. When making such a determination, the court may consider whether the child's parent is currently able and willing to care for the child or that the related caregiver is unable to continue to care for the child.

Acts 2009, ch. 411, § 11; 2017, ch. 263, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 411, § 12 provided that the act, which amended §§36-1-102,36-1-108,37-1-102,37-2-402 and added new §37-1-183, shall apply to conduct covered by the provisions of the act that occurs on or after July 1, 2009. The eighteen (18) month time period set out in §37-1-102(b)(12)(J) shall not commence until July 1, 2009.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “§37-1-102(b)(13)(J)” for “§37-1-102(b)(12)(J)” in the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 263, § 5. July 1, 2017.

37-1-184. Provider performance metrics.

The department shall develop a system of performance-based metrics and incentives to use with the state institutions, foster and group homes, and any other entities, public or private, that are authorized by law to receive or provide care or services for children under this part.

These metrics and incentives should encourage use of graduated responses, evidence-based programming, and an intended timeline of three (3) to six (6) months for successful program completion.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 50.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. July 1, 2018; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

37-1-185. Report on juvenile justice data collection.

The administrative office of the courts, the department of children's services, and the commission on children and youth shall jointly submit a report addressing statewide data collection in the juvenile justice system, on or before January 1, 2019, to the governor, speaker of the senate, and speaker of the house of representatives. Appropriate school and law enforcement personnel shall be consulted in preparing the report. This report shall include:

A plan to effectuate comprehensive, accurate collection of data and performance measures from all juvenile courts in the state pursuant to § 37-1-506 and other relevant statutory provisions;

Uniform definitions and criteria for data collection to ensure clear and consistent reporting across all agencies and counties;

Proposed forms for future data collection from juvenile courts and county-level agencies; and

Any other recommendations relevant to improving statewide data collection in the juvenile justice system.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 51.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. May 21, 2018; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect May 21, 2018.

37-1-186. Notification of resources and funding for relative caregivers — Distribution of information.

As used in this section, “relative caregiver” means a person within a first, second, or third degree of relationship to the parent or step-parent of a child who may be related through blood, marriage, or adoption.

Any court that issues an order granting custody or guardianship of a child to a person who qualifies as a relative caregiver shall notify the relative caregiver that resources and funding for relative caregivers may be available through programs administered by the department.

The department shall distribute information on available relative caregiver resources to the administrative office of the courts, and the administrative office of the courts shall distribute the information to each court within the state that issues orders regarding child custody or guardianship. For purposes of satisfying the requirements of this subsection (c), the distribution of resource information may be accomplished by electronic means.

Acts 2019, ch. 130, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 130, § 2. July 1, 2019; provided that for administrative and rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 9, 2019.